North Dakota statutes. TITLE 50 Public Welfare
CHAPTER 50-06.4 Traumatic Brain Injuries

50-06.4-01.
Definitions. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

As used in this chapter:

“Brain injury” means damage to the brain or the coverings of the brain which produces an altered mental state and results in a decrease in cognitive, behavioral, emotional, or physical functioning. The term does not include an insult of a degenerative or congenital nature.

“Department” means the department of human services.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 475, § 1; 2015, ch. 334, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 400, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 334, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

50-06.4-01.
Definitions. [Effective September 1, 2022]

As used in this chapter:

“Brain injury” means damage to the brain or the coverings of the brain which produces an altered mental state and results in a decrease in cognitive, behavioral, emotional, or physical functioning. The term does not include an insult of a degenerative or congenital nature.

“Department” means the department of health and human services.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 475, § 1; 2015, ch. 334, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 400, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 352, § 410, effective September 1, 2022.

50-06.4-02.
Department to be lead agency — Cooperation of other agencies — Joint meeting. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The department shall act as lead agency in the state for the purpose of coordinating services to individuals with brain injury. At least annually the department shall call a joint meeting of the adjutant general, the state department of health, the department of veterans’ affairs, and the superintendent of public instruction to discuss the provision of services to individuals with brain injury. State agencies and political subdivision agencies shall cooperate with the department to permit the department to efficiently coordinate services to individuals with brain injury while avoiding duplication of services. Neither this chapter, nor any activity undertaken by the department under this chapter, may be construed as creating a right to any benefit or service not specifically required to be granted as a condition of the receipt of grants of federal funds.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 475, § 2; 2009, ch. 418, § 4; 2015, ch. 334, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 334, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 4 of chapter 418, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

50-06.4-02.
Department to be lead agency — Cooperation of other agencies — Joint meeting. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department shall act as lead agency in the state for the purpose of coordinating services to individuals with brain injury. At least annually the department shall call a joint meeting of the adjutant general, the department of veterans’ affairs, and the superintendent of public instruction to discuss the provision of services to individuals with brain injury. State agencies and political subdivision agencies shall cooperate with the department to permit the department to efficiently coordinate services to individuals with brain injury while avoiding duplication of services. Neither this chapter, nor any activity undertaken by the department under this chapter, may be construed as creating a right to any benefit or service not specifically required to be granted as a condition of the receipt of grants of federal funds.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 475, § 2; 2009, ch. 418, § 4; 2015, ch. 334, § 2, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 352, § 411, effective September 1, 2022.

50-06.4-03.
Department may submit plans — Seek waivers.

The department may submit state plans and amendments to state plans, concerning programs administered under this title, to carry out this chapter. The department may seek appropriate waivers of the requirements of federal statutes or regulations as authorized by federal law.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 475, § 3.

50-06.4-04.
Authority to accept and expend grants, gifts, and services.

The department may apply for and accept any funds, grants, gifts, or services made available for the purpose of providing or coordinating services to individuals with brain injury by any federal agency or department or any private agency or individual. Funds received by the department under this section must be deposited in the state treasury in a special fund designated as the brain injury fund and may be spent within the limits of legislative appropriation.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 475, § 4; 1997, ch. 445, § 1; 2015, ch. 334, § 3, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 334, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

50-06.4-05.
Brain injury — Prevention and identification activities.

The department shall provide outreach services and conduct public awareness efforts regarding the prevention and identification of brain injury.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 418, § 1; 2015, ch. 334, § 4, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 4 of chapter 334, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

This section became effective July 1, 2009.

50-06.4-06.
Brain injury — Services and activities — Acceptance of moneys.

The department may accept and expend moneys from any public or private source, including federal sources, for any purpose involving brain injuries or the provision of services to individuals with brain injury and their families.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 418, § 2; 2015, ch. 334, § 5, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 5 of chapter 334, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

This section became effective July 1, 2009.

50-06.4-07.
Brain injury — Informal supports — Contracts — Exemption.

The department shall contract with public or private entities for the provision of informal supports to individuals with brain injury. As used in this section, “informal supports” includes information sharing and referral services, peer mentoring, training, facilitation of support groups, public awareness efforts, and individual and programmatic advocacy efforts.

Any entity contracting with the department under this section must:

Demonstrate expertise in serving and enhancing the quality of life for individuals with brain injury;

Agree to work in cooperation with the department, case managers, and veterans’ service officers; and

Agree to consult with veterans and other individuals having brain injury, their families, and their caregivers.

The department is exempt from complying with chapter 54-44.4 with respect to contracting for the provision of informal supports under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 418, § 3; 2015, ch. 334, § 6, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 6 of chapter 334, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

This section became effective July 1, 2009.

50-06.4-08.
Social and recreational services.

The department shall provide or contract for the provision of social and recreational services, including day supports, to individuals with brain injury, if the department determines that available vocational rehabilitative services do not meet the individuals’ needs.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 418, § 5; 2015, ch. 334, § 7, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 7 of chapter 334, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

This section became effective July 1, 2009.

50-06.4-09.
Vocational rehabilitation and consultation.

The department shall provide or contract for the provision of increased and specialized vocational rehabilitation and consultation to individuals with brain injury who receive case management for personal care services. Services under this section include extended support for individuals at risk of losing their employment upon exhausting their vocational services.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 418, § 6; 2015, ch. 334, § 8, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 8 of chapter 334, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

This section became effective July 1, 2009.

50-06.4-10.
Brain injury advisory council. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The governor shall appoint at least five, but no more than nine, voting members to serve on the brain injury advisory council. The governor may make appointments under this subsection so a majority of the total voting members appointed under subsections 1 and 2 are brain injury survivors and family members of brain injury survivors. The members appointed by the governor must consist of the following:

At least one brain injury survivor, nominated by the council;

At least one family member of a brain injury survivor, nominated by the council;

At least one service provider who provides services to brain injury survivors, nominated by the council, who may be a brain injury survivor or a family member of a brain injury survivor;

An individual representing the Indian affairs commission, nominated by the Indian affairs commission, who may be a brain injury survivor or a family member of a brain injury survivor; and

At least one individual representing a religious, charitable, fraternal, civic, educational, legal, veteran, welfare, or professional group or organization, who may be a brain injury survivor or a family member of a brain injury survivor.

The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one member of the house of representatives and the president pro tempore of the senate shall appoint one member of the senate to serve as members of the council. Each legislative member of the council is entitled to receive compensation from the legislative council for each day spent in meetings of the council and for reimbursement for related travel and other necessary expenses in the amounts provided by law for other state officers.

Each of the following entities shall appoint a representative to serve as a nonvoting member of the council who serves at the pleasure of the appointing entity:

Protection and advocacy project, one representative;

State department of health, one individual representing injury prevention and one representative representing emergency medical services and trauma;

Department of human services, one individual representing behavioral health, one individual representing Medicaid, and one individual representing vocational rehabilitation; and

Department of public instruction, one representative.

The governor may appoint an individual representing stroke health to serve as a nonvoting member of the council who serves at the pleasure of the governor.

A voting advisory council member appointed by the governor may not serve more than two consecutive four-year terms on the council.

A council member appointed under subdivision a or b of subsection 1 is entitled to receive from the department reimbursement for expenses as provided by law for state officers and per diem compensation as determined by the department if the member is attending meetings or performing duties directed by the council.

The council shall elect a chairman and vice chairman from the voting membership of the council and shall elect a secretary from the voting or nonvoting membership of the council. The council shall meet quarterly. A majority of the voting members of the council constitutes a quorum. The council shall adopt bylaws.

The council shall advise the department and shall participate in activities to improve the quality of life for an individual with brain injury and the individual’s family through brain injury awareness, prevention, research, education, collaboration, support services, and advocacy.

The department shall contract with a private, nonprofit agency that does not provide brain injury services, to facilitate and provide support services to the council.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 337, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 37, § 5, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 364, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 412, effective September 1, 2022.

Note.

Section 2 of chapter 337, S.L. 2017 provides, “

APPLICATION.

The governor shall stagger the initial terms of the brain injury advisory council so approximately half of the initial appointments made by the governor serve two-year terms and the remainder of the initial appointments serve four-year terms. For the initial appointments to the advisory council, the department of human services shall submit nominees in place of the council.”

Note.

Section 50-06.4-10 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 412 of Chapter 352, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1247; and Section 1 of Chapter 364, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2039.

50-06.4-10.
Brain injury advisory council. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The governor shall appoint at least five, but no more than nine, voting members to serve on the brain injury advisory council. The governor may make appointments under this subsection so a majority of the total voting members appointed under subsections 1 and 2 are brain injury survivors and family members of brain injury survivors. The members appointed by the governor must consist of the following:

At least one brain injury survivor, nominated by the council;

At least one family member of a brain injury survivor, nominated by the council;

At least one service provider who provides services to brain injury survivors, nominated by the council, who may be a brain injury survivor or a family member of a brain injury survivor;

An individual representing the Indian affairs commission, nominated by the Indian affairs commission, who may be a brain injury survivor or a family member of a brain injury survivor; and

At least one individual representing a religious, charitable, fraternal, civic, educational, legal, veteran, welfare, or professional group or organization, who may be a brain injury survivor or a family member of a brain injury survivor.

The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one member of the house of representatives and the president pro tempore of the senate shall appoint one member of the senate to serve as members of the council. Each legislative member of the council is entitled to receive compensation from the legislative council for each day spent in meetings of the council and for reimbursement for related travel and other necessary expenses in the amounts provided by law for other state officers.

Each of the following entities shall appoint a representative to serve as a nonvoting member of the council who serves at the pleasure of the appointing entity:

Protection and advocacy project, one representative;

Department, one individual representing injury prevention and one representative representing emergency medical services and trauma, one individual representing behavioral health, one individual representing Medicaid, and one individual representing vocational rehabilitation; and

Department of public instruction, one representative.

The governor may appoint an individual representing stroke health to serve as a nonvoting member of the council who serves at the pleasure of the governor.

A voting advisory council member appointed by the governor may not serve more than two consecutive four-year terms on the council.

A council member appointed under subdivision a or b of subsection 1 is entitled to receive from the department reimbursement for expenses as provided by law for state officers and per diem compensation as determined by the department if the member is attending meetings or performing duties directed by the council.

The council shall elect a chairman and vice chairman from the voting membership of the council and shall elect a secretary from the voting or nonvoting membership of the council. The council shall meet quarterly. A majority of the voting members of the council constitutes a quorum. The council shall adopt bylaws.

The council shall advise the department and shall participate in activities to improve the quality of life for an individual with brain injury and the individual’s family through brain injury awareness, prevention, research, education, collaboration, support services, and advocacy.

The department shall contract with a private, nonprofit agency that does not provide brain injury services, to facilitate and provide support services to the council.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 337, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 37, § 5, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 364, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 412, effective September 1, 2022.